Maine, session 132, LD2042.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §2007 is enacted to read:
§2007. Public notice
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a municipality required by this
Title to place a notice in a newspaper may meet this requirement by placing the notice on
the newspaper's publicly accessible website or the statewide repository for legal notices as
described in Title 1, section 603, subsection 2, as long as either action is followed by
placement of the notice in the next available print edition of the newspaper. The notice on
the newspaper's publicly accessible website must contain all information required to be
published in a newspaper.
Page 1 - 132LR2804(03)